Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202653-103.52
Rickhouse, defined.

Rickhouse means an offsite bonded warehouse which is kept and maintained for the purpose of storing spirits in barrels for aging in order to impart flavor from the barrel into the spirits.

Laws 2024, LB1204, § 21.